Maryland, session 2025, HB0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–106.8.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, an individual shall be
exempt from paying the out–of–state tuition rate at a public institution of higher education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0207*

HOUSE BILL 207
in the State, and shall be eligible for the tuition rates described under subsections (c) and
(d) of this section, if the individual:
(4) Provides to the public institution of higher education documentation
that the individual or the individual’s parent or legal guardian has filed a Maryland income
tax return annually for the [3–year] 2–YEAR period before the academic year in which the
tuition rate exemption would apply;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.